Mississippi, session 2026, HB1775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The governing authorities of the City of Philadelphia, Mississippi, is authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to make a one-time donation from the city's general fund in an amount not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), during calendar year 2026, to Philadelphia Transit, which is a nonprofit organization that provides transportation services for senior citizens, disabled citizens, low-income families and the general public in east central Mississippi, including the City of Philadelphia. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.